Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Part 4

Punishment of Inmates

41-21-401. Defense against violence or attempt to escape.

When personal violence is offered by a inmate to an officer, employee or to another inmate, or when an attempt is made to escape, or to do injury to the building, or any material, implements, etc., those officers and employees are authorized to use all necessary means of defense and to secure the person of the offender.

Code 1858, § 5523 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 38, § 25); Shan., § 7542; Code 1932, § 12140; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-706.

41-21-402. Solitary confinement.

Any inmate who neglects or refuses to perform the labor assigned, willfully injures any of the materials, implements or tools, engages in conversation with any other inmate or in any other manner violates any of the regulations of the penitentiary, may be punished by solitary confinement for a period not exceeding thirty (30) days for each offense, at the discretion of the warden or the person acting in the warden's place.

Every inmate punished by solitary confinement shall be shut up in a cell and fed with bread and water only during solitary confinement, unless the physician certifies to the warden that the health of the inmate requires other diet.

Code 1858, §§ 5518, 5519 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 38, § 25); Shan., §§ 7537, 7538; Code 1932, §§ 12136, 12137; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 41-707, 41-719.

Law Reviews.

Administrative Decisions in Prisons: Are Prisoners Entitled to Procedural Due Process? (Lee Freudberg), 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 85 (1972).

41-21-403. Report of inmates in solitary.

It is the duty of the warden to report immediately to the commissioner of correction the name of each person committed to solitary confinement, with a statement of the nature of the person's offense, the date of confinement and the period for which committed, which report shall be filed and recorded.

Code 1858, § 5521 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 38, § 25); impl. am. Acts 1895 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1897, ch. 125, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1915, ch. 20, § 9; Shan., § 7540; impl. am. Acts 1919, ch. 39, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 42; Code 1932, § 12139; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-720.

41-21-404. Unauthorized means of punishment.

No inmate shall be punished in any other way than is provided in this title, except by the authority of the commissioner of correction.

Code 1858, § 5520; impl. am. Acts 1895 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, § 21; impl. am. Acts 1897, ch. 125, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1915, ch. 20, § 9; Shan., § 7539; impl. am. Acts 1919, ch. 39, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 42; Code 1932, § 12138; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-721.

41-21-405. Self-inflicted wounds by inmate to escape labor — Punishment.

If any person confined in the penitentiary, in a county workhouse, a city or county jail or any other penal institution, upon any charge of or conviction of any criminal offense, by any means or method willfully inflicts any wound upon such inmate's own person for the purpose of or with the effect of rendering the inmate unfit for or incapable of performing any labor assigned, the inmate may be confined in solitary confinement or subject to such other punishment, not inconsistent with humanity, as may be deemed necessary by the warden, sheriff or commissioners for the government and control of the inmates. Inmates who are placed in solitary confinement or who are hospitalized as a result of any self-inflicted wounds shall receive no credit for the time so spent.

Acts 1959, ch. 76, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-723.

Law Reviews.

Criminal Law and Procedure — 1959 Tennessee Survey (Robert E. Kendrick), 12 Vand. L. Rev. 1131 (1959).

41-21-406. Inmates as witnesses against each other.

The inmates in the penitentiary shall be competent witnesses against each other in all prosecutions under §§ 39-12-101, 39-13-304, 39-16-201, 39-16-402, 39-16-403, 39-16-605 — 39-16-607, 39-17-302, 39-17-303, chapter 1, part 1 of this title, parts 1-4 of this chapter and chapter 22, parts 1 and 2 of this title.

Code 1858, § 5559 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 38, § 32); Shan., § 7581; Code 1932, § 12179; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-717; Acts 1996, ch. 675, § 42.

Cross-References. Federal prisoner as witness in state criminal proceedings, § 40-17-212.

Prisoner as witness in criminal proceedings outside state in which incarcerated, § 40-17-211.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Prisons and Prisoners, § 7.

Law Reviews.

Infamy as Ground of Disqualification in Tennessee, 22 Tenn. L. Rev. 554 (1953).

41-21-407. Evidence of former convictions.

Upon the trial, copies of the records transmitted to the warden of the penitentiary relative to the former trial of inmates, shall be presumptive evidence of the former conviction.

Code 1858, § 5538 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 38, § 30); Shan., § 7557; Code 1932, § 12156; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-718.

41-21-408. Reports of violence within correctional facilities.

The warden or chief administrative officer of each correctional facility owned or operated by the department of correction shall forward a report detailing all acts of violence committed by or against any guard, employee or inmate in the facility to the district attorney general of the judicial district in which the violent act occurred.

The report shall include, as to each act of violence, a copy of any internal investigation report prepared, the results of any disciplinary committee hearing and any disciplinary action taken concerning the act of violence.

If the release of the information would endanger or compromise the security of any inmate or the security of the institution, the warden or chief administrative officer shall have the discretion to classify the information and maintain the confidentiality of the information.

Acts 1982, ch. 659, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-728.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.